New Mexico, session 2026, SB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 7-2-5.11 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2007, Chapter 45, Section 11) is amended to read: "7-2-5.11. EXEMPTION--[ARMED FORCES] UNIFORMED SERVICE SALARIES.-- A. A salary paid by the United States to a taxpayer for [active duty] service in the [armed forces] uniformed services of the United States is exempt from state income taxation. B. A taxpayer allowed an exemption pursuant to this section shall report the amount of the exemption to the department in a manner required by the department. C. The exemption provided by this section shall be included in the tax expenditure budget pursuant to Section 7-1-84 NMSA 1978, including the annual aggregate cost of the exemption. D. As used in this section, "uniformed service" means: (1) active and reserve components of the army, navy, air force, space force, marine corps or coast guard of the United States; (2) the United States merchant marine; (3) the commissioned corps of the United States public health service; (4) the commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration of the United States; or (5) the national guard of a state." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. - 2 -